Washington statutes.
RCW 19.154.800

Application.

Nothing in this chapter shall apply to or regulate any business to the extent such regulation is prohibited or preempted by federal law.

[ 2011 c 244 s 7.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2011 c 244: See note following RCW 19.154.010.